Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB192.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102(w)(14) and the last paragraph of subsection (w) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended, the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words, when used in 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 this act, shall have the following meanings, unless otherwise clearly apparent from the context:* * *(h.1) The word "homeless" shall have the same meaning as under 42 U.S.C. § 11302 (relating to general definition of homeless individual).* * *(w) The words "qualified absentee elector" shall mean:* * *(14) Any qualified elector who will not attend a polling place because of the observance of a religious holiday[:]; or(15) Any qualified elector who is confined in a correctional institution for other than a felony conviction, including those convicted of misdemeanors, those undergoing pretrial confinement and those in a custodial nonconviction status:Provided, however, That the words "qualified absentee elector" shall in nowise be construed to include persons confined in [a penal institution or] a mental institution nor shall it in anywise be construed to include a person not otherwise qualified as a qualified elector in accordance with the definition set forth in section 102(t) of this act.* * *(z.7) The words "correctional institution" shall mean any penal institution, penitentiary, State farm, reformatory, prison, jail, house of correction, juvenile detention facility or other institution located in this Commonwealth for the incarceration or custody of persons under sentence for offenses or awaiting trial or sentence for offenses.Section 2. Section 704 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:20250SB0192PN0142 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 704. Rules for Determining Residence.--In determining the residence of a person desiring to register or vote, the following rules shall be followed so far as they may be applicable:* * *(i) The following for persons lacking a specific physical address:(1) If a person resides in an area lacking a specific physical address or is homeless, instead of an address, the person may submit a description, such as a map or the latitude and longitude, indicating where the person resides, and the person shall be assigned to a precinct based on the geographic description of where the person resides.(2) If a person confined in a correctional institution was homeless prior to confinement, the person may, instead of an address, submit a description, such as a map or the latitude and longitude, indicating where the person resided prior to confinement, and the person shall be assigned to a precinct based on the geographic description of where the person resided prior to confinement.(3) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall issue rules regarding acceptable forms of nonphysical addresses.Section 3. Section 1301(n) and last paragraph of the section are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1301. Qualified Absentee Electors.--The following persons shall be entitled to vote by an official absentee ballot in any primary or election held in this Commonwealth in the manner hereinafter provided:* * *20250SB0192PN0142 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (n) Any qualified elector who will not attend a polling place because of the observance of a religious holiday[:]; or(o) Any qualified elector who is confined in a correctional institution for other than a felony conviction, including those convicted of misdemeanors, those undergoing pretrial confinement and those in a custodial nonconviction status:Provided, however, That the words "qualified absentee elector" shall in nowise be construed to include persons confined in [a penal institution or] a mental institution nor shall it in anywise be construed to include a person not otherwise qualified as a qualified elector in accordance with the definition set forth in section 102(t) of this act.Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1306.2. Voting by Absentee Electors in Correctional Institutions.--(a) The department, in consultation with the Department of Corrections, shall establish a uniform policy for civic education in correctional institutions, including, but not limited to, notifications of all Federal, State, county, local and primary elections. The department shall provide correctional institutions with:(1) information pertaining to voter registration, absentee ballots, mail-in ballots and eligibility requirements;(2) the necessary forms and applications; and(3) the necessary training for obtaining and casting a ballot.(b) (1) A correctional institution shall designate at least one individual to help inmates vote. Designated individuals in a correctional institution shall provide the information under subsection (a) to each inmate and oversee the distribution, collection and submission of voter registration applications and 20250SB0192PN0142 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 absentee ballots. The designated individual must be a staff member of the correctional institution and may not be an inmate.(2) The secretary shall establish procedures to ensure a correctional institution establishes a policy designating at least one individual to help inmates vote, and this shall ensure that election resources and ballots are provided in multiple languages, as required by the language access needs of the correctional institution.(c) The Department of Corrections shall promulgate regulations necessary to establish procedures for a correctional institution to inspect incoming voter registration applications and absentee ballots for contraband. The procedures may not involve opening or reading voter registration applications or absentee ballots to preserve secrecy in voting.(d) The superintendent, warden or other authorized individual in charge of a correctional institution shall collect data that includes, but is not limited to, the following:(1) demographic information of the correctional institution's inmate population;(2) the number of qualified absentee electors in the correctional institution;(3) the number of inmates registered to vote;(4) the number of inmates that have applied for a ballot;(5) the number of inmates that submitted a completed ballot; and(6) any other information requested by the department.(e) The superintendent, warden or other authorized individual in charge of a correctional institution shall submit a report of the data collected under subsection (d) to the department within thirty (30) days after a general election. The 20250SB0192PN0142 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department shall prescribe the form of the report, and shall issue guidance to implement the provisions of this section.(f) As used in this section:"Department" shall mean the Department of State of the Commonwealth."Inmate" shall mean an offender who is committed to, under sentence to or confined in a correctional institution. The term shall not include an offender committed under a violation of 25 Pa.C.S. § 1703 (relating to application) or of this act.Section 5. This act shall take effect in one year.20250SB0192PN0142 - 6 - 12345678910